Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Hardship Licenses

189A.400.
Sentencing court jurisdiction over issuance of ignition interlock and hardship licenses — Commonwealth’s or county attorney’s review of application and right to object.

The sentencing court shall have jurisdiction over the issuance of hardship licenses.

The Commonwealth’s or county attorney shall review applications submitted to the sentencing court and may object to the issuance of hardship licenses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 24, effective July 1, 1991; 2015 ch. 124, § 10, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 103, § 20, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.410.
Hardship license — Prohibition against issuance when alcohol or substance test refused.

At any time during the suspension periods enumerated in:

KRS

189A.070

for violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(c) or (d); or

KRS

189A.090

relating to a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(c) or (d);

the court may grant the person hardship driving privileges for the balance of the suspension period imposed by the Transportation Cabinet, if the court finds reasonable cause to believe that revocation would hinder the person’s ability to continue his or her employment; continue attending school or an educational institution; obtain necessary medical care; attend driver improvement, alcohol, or substance abuse education programs; or attend court-ordered counseling or other programs.

Before granting hardship driving privileges, the court shall order the person to:

Provide the court with proof of motor vehicle insurance;

If necessary, provide the court with a written, sworn statement from his or her employer, on a form provided by the cabinet, detailing his or her job, hours of employment, and the necessity for the person to use the employer’s motor vehicle either in his or her work at the direction of the employer during working hours, or in travel to and from work if the license is sought for employment purposes; and

If the person is self-employed, to provide the information required in paragraph (b) of this subsection together with a sworn statement as to its truth;

Provide the court with a written, sworn statement from the school or educational institution which he attends, of his or her class schedule, courses being undertaken, and the necessity for the person to use a motor vehicle in his travel to and from school or other educational institution if the license is sought for educational purposes. Licenses for educational purposes shall not include participation in sports, social, extracurricular, fraternal, or other noneducational activities;

Provide the court with a written, sworn statement from a physician, or other medical professional licensed but not certified under the laws of Kentucky, attesting to the person’s normal hours of treatment, and the necessity to use a motor vehicle to travel to and from the treatment if the license is sought for medical purposes;

Provide the court with a written, sworn statement from the director of any alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment program as to the hours in which the person is expected to participate in the program, the nature of the program, and the necessity for the person to use a motor vehicle to travel to and from the program if the license is sought for alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment purposes;

Provide the court with a copy of any court order relating to treatment, participation in driver improvement programs, or other terms and conditions ordered by the court relating to the person which require him or her to use a motor vehicle in traveling to and from the court-ordered program. The judge shall include in the order the necessity for the use of the motor vehicle; and

Provide to the court any information as may be required by administrative regulation of the Transportation Cabinet.

The court shall not issue a hardship license to a person who has refused to take an alcohol concentration or substance test or tests offered by a law enforcement officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 25, effective July 1, 1991; 1996, ch. 198, § 16, effective October 1, 1996; 2000, ch. 467, § 17, effective October 1, 2000; 2002, ch. 171, § 6, effective July 15, 2002; 2015 ch. 124, § 16, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 85, § 8, effective April 9, 2016; 2019 ch. 103, § 21, effective July 1, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 10 provided that that Act shall be known as the Brianna Taylor Act. This statute was amended in Section 8 of that Act.

189A.420.
Renumbered as KRS 189A.360, effective July 1, 2020. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 26, effective July 1, 1991; 2015 ch. 124, § 11, effective June 24, 2015; renumbered to KRS §

189A.360

by 2019 ch. 103, § 18, effective July 1, 2020.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS

189A.360

effective July 1, 2020.

189A.430.
Permit card and window decal for hardship driving privileges — Requirement to carry permit — Penalty for failure to display decal. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 27, effective July 1, 1991; repealed by 2019 ch. 103, § 25, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.440.
Prohibition against use of vehicle other than for purpose authorized by hardship license — Penalty — Penalty for false application statement.

No person who is issued a hardship license shall operate a motor vehicle at any time, place, or for any purpose other than those authorized upon the face of the hardship license issued under KRS

189A.410

.

Any defendant who violates the provisions of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor, and shall have his or her license suspended by the Transportation Cabinet for the initial period of suspension under KRS

189A.070

for an additional six (6) months.

Any defendant or any other person who knowingly assists the defendant in making a false application statement is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and shall have his or her motor vehicle or motorcycle operator’s license suspended by the Transportation Cabinet for six (6) months.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 28, effective July 1, 1991; 2015 ch. 124, § 12, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 103, § 22, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.450.
Service fee for hardship driving privileges. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 29, effective July 1, 1991; repealed by 2019 ch. 103, § 25, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.460.
Transportation Cabinet’s responsibility as to administrative regulations and forms relating to hardship licenses.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations and shall issue hardship license application forms and other forms necessary for the implementation of KRS

189A.400

to

189A.460

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 30, effective July 1, 1991.

189A.500.
Ignition interlock devices and licenses — Certification of devices and device providers — Provider contract provisions. [Renumbered]

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 124, § 15, effective June 24, 2015; renumbered to KRS §

189A.350

by 2019 ch. 103, § 17, effective July 1, 2020.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS

189A.350

effective July 1, 2020.